Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 23.1-900.
Academic transcripts; suspension, permanent dismissal, or withdrawal from institution.

As used in this section, “sexual violence” means physical sexual acts perpetrated against a person’s will or against a person incapable of giving consent.

The registrar of each (i) private institution of higher education that is eligible to participate in the Tuition Assistance Grant Program pursuant to the Tuition Assistance Grant Act (§

23.1-628

et seq.) or to receive project financing from the Virginia College Building Authority pursuant to Article 2 (§

23.1-1220

et seq.) of Chapter 12 and (ii) public institution of higher education, or the other employee, office, or department of the institution that is responsible for maintaining student academic records, shall include a prominent notation on the academic transcript of each student who has been suspended for, has been permanently dismissed for, or withdraws from the institution while under investigation for an offense involving sexual violence under the institution’s code, rules, or set of standards governing student conduct stating that such student was suspended for, was permanently dismissed for, or withdrew from the institution while under investigation for an offense involving sexual violence under the institution’s code, rules, or set of standards. Such notation shall be substantially in the following form: “[Suspended, Dismissed, or Withdrew while under investigation] for a violation of [insert name of institution’s code, rules, or set of standards].” Each such institution shall (a) notify each student that any such suspension, permanent dismissal, or withdrawal will be documented on the student’s academic transcript; (b) adopt a procedure for removing such notation from the academic transcript of any student who is subsequently found not to have committed an offense involving sexual violence under the institution’s code, rules, or set of standards governing student conduct; and (c) adopt a policy for the expungement of such notation for good cause shown and after a period of three years.

The institution shall remove from a student’s academic transcript any notation placed on such transcript pursuant to subsection B due to such student’s suspension if the student (i) completed the term and any conditions of the suspension and (ii) has been determined by the institution to be in good standing according to the institution’s code, rules, or set of standards governing such a determination.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to a student who is taking or has taken a course at a public institution of higher education or private institution of higher education on a campus that is located in the Commonwealth; however, the provisions of this section shall not apply to any public institution of higher education established pursuant to Chapter 25 (§

23.1-2500

et seq.).

History.

2015, c. 771, § 23-9.2:18; 2016, c. 588; 2020, c. 433.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 433, added “and (c) adopt a policy for the expungement of such notation for good cause shown and after a period of three years” in the last sentence of subsection B and made stylistic changes.

§ 23.1-900.01.
Diplomas; proof of education; method.

Each public institution of higher education and private institution of higher education may provide any diploma or other proof of education to requesting individuals or entities using the method that it deems most appropriate, in either electronic or paper form.

The Council shall post on its website a statement in accordance with the provisions of subsection A.

History.

2018, c. 515.

§ 23.1-900.1.
Repealed by Acts 2018, c. 751, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions pertaining to constitutionally protected speech on campus, see §

23.1-401.1

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

23.1-900.1

, pertaining to speech on campus, derived from Acts
2017, c. 506.